Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX P vi      ssemusque       vi        
SFX P vi      ssemusne        vi        
SFX P vi      ssemusve        vi        
SFX P vi      ssetis          vi        
SFX P vi      ssetisque       vi        
SFX P vi      ssetisne        vi        
SFX P vi      ssetisve        vi        
SFX P vi      ssent           vi        
SFX P vi      ssentque        vi        
SFX P vi      ssentne         vi        
SFX P vi      ssentve         vi        
SFX P i       isse            i         
SFX P i       isseque         i         
SFX P i       issene          i         
SFX P i       isseve          i         
SFX P vi      sse             vi        
SFX P vi      sseque          vi        
SFX P vi      ssene           vi        
SFX P vi      sseve           vi        
SFX P o       avi             o         
SFX P o       avique          o         
SFX P o       avine           o         
SFX P o       avive           o         
SFX P o       avisti          o         
SFX P o       avistique       o         
SFX P o       avistine        o         
SFX P o       avistive        o         
SFX P o       avit            o         
SFX P o       avitque         o         
SFX P o       avitne          o         
SFX P o       avitve          o         
SFX P o       avimus          o         
SFX P o       avimusque       o         
SFX P o       avimusne        o         
SFX P o       avimusve        o         
SFX P o       avistis         o         
SFX P o       avistisque      o         
SFX P o       avistisne       o         
SFX P o       avistisve       o         
SFX P o       averunt         o         
SFX P o       averuntque      o         
SFX P o       averuntne       o         
SFX P o       averuntve       o         
SFX P o       avere           o         
SFX P o       avereque        o         
SFX P o       averene         o         
SFX P o       avereve         o         
SFX P o       ai              o         
SFX P o       aque            o         
SFX P o       ane             o         
SFX P o       ave             o         
SFX P o       asti            o         
SFX P o       astique         o         
SFX P o       astine          o         
SFX P o       astive          o         
SFX P o       at              o         
SFX P o       atque           o         
SFX P o       atne            o         
SFX P o       atve            o         
SFX P o       amus            o         
SFX P o       amusque         o         
SFX P o       amusne          o         
SFX P o       amusve          o         
SFX P o       astis           o         
SFX P o       astisque        o         
SFX P o       astisne         o         
SFX P o       astisve         o         
SFX P o       arunt           o         
SFX P o       aruntque        o         
SFX P o       aruntne         o         
SFX P o       aruntve         o         
SFX P o       are             o         
SFX P o       areque          o         
SFX P o       arene           o         
SFX P o       areve           o         
SFX P o       averam          o         
SFX P o       averamque       o         
SFX P o       averamne        o         
SFX P o       averamve        o         
SFX P o       averas          o         
SFX P o       averasque       o         
SFX P o       averasne        o         
SFX P o       averasve        o         
SFX P o       averat          o         
SFX P o       averatque       o         
SFX P o       averatne        o         
SFX P o       averatve        o         
SFX P o       averamus        o         
SFX P o       averamusque     o         
SFX P o       averamusne      o         
SFX P o       averamusve      o         
SFX P o       averatis        o         
SFX P o       averatisque     o         
SFX P o       averatisne      o         
SFX P o       averatisve      o         
SFX P o       averant         o         
SFX P o       averantque      o         
SFX P o       averantne       o         
SFX P o       averantve       o         
SFX P o       aram            o         
SFX P o       aramque         o         
SFX P o       aramne          o         
SFX P o       aramve          o         
SFX P o       aras            o         
SFX P o       arasque         o         
SFX P o       arasne          o         
SFX P o       arasve          o         
SFX P o       arat            o         
SFX P o       aratque         o         
SFX P o       aratne          o         
SFX P o       aratve          o         
SFX P o       aramus          o         
SFX P o       aramusque       o         
SFX P o       aramusne        o         
SFX P o       aramusve        o         
SFX P o       aratis          o         
SFX P o       aratisque       o         
SFX P o       aratisne        o         
SFX P o       aratisve        o         
SFX P o       arant           o         
SFX P o       arantque        o         
SFX P o       arantne         o         
SFX P o       arantve         o         
SFX P o       avero           o         
SFX P o       averoque        o         
SFX P o       averone         o         
SFX P o       averove         o         
SFX P o       averis          o         
SFX P o       averisque       o         
SFX P o       averisne        o         
SFX P o       averisve        o         
SFX P o       averit          o         
SFX P o       averitque       o         
SFX P o       averitne        o         
SFX P o       averitve        o         
SFX P o       averimus        o         
SFX P o       averimusque     o         
SFX P o       averimusne      o         
SFX P o       averimusve      o         
SFX P o       averitis        o         
SFX P o       averitisque     o         
SFX P o       averitisne      o         
SFX P o       averitisve      o         
SFX P o       averint         o         
SFX P o       averintque      o         
SFX P o       averintne       o         
SFX P o       averintve       o         
SFX P o       aro             o         
SFX P o       aroque          o         
SFX P o       arone           o         
SFX P o       arove           o         
SFX P o       aris            o         
SFX P o       arisque         o         
SFX P o       arisne          o         
SFX P o       arisve          o         
SFX P o       arit            o         
SFX P o       aritque         o         
SFX P o       aritne          o         
SFX P o       aritve          o         
SFX P o       arimus          o         
SFX P o       arimusque       o         
SFX P o       arimusne        o         
SFX P o       arimusve        o         
SFX P o       aritis          o         
SFX P o       aritisque       o         
SFX P o       aritisne        o         
SFX P o       aritisve        o         
SFX P o       arint           o         
SFX P o       arintque        o         
SFX P o       arintne         o         
SFX P o       arintve         o         
SFX P o       averim          o         
SFX P o       averimque       o         
SFX P o       averimne        o         
SFX P o       averimve        o         
SFX P o       arim            o         
SFX P o       arimque         o         
SFX P o       arimne          o         
SFX P o       arimve          o         
SFX P o       avissem         o         
SFX P o       avissemque      o         
SFX P o       avissemne       o         
SFX P o       avissemve       o         
SFX P o       avisses         o         
SFX P o       avissesque      o         
SFX P o       avissesne       o         
SFX P o       avissesve       o         
SFX P o       avisset         o         
SFX P o       avissetque      o         
SFX P o       avissetne       o         
SFX P o       avissetve       o         
SFX P o       avissemus       o         
SFX P o       avissemusque    o         
SFX P o       avissemusne     o         
SFX P o       avissemusve     o         
