Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abegi/P
abieci/P
abnui/P
abripui/P
abscidi/P
absorbui/P
abstraxi/P
abundo/APS
accersivi/P
accivi/P
accubo/APS
accurri/P
acui/Pq
adauxi/P
adcommodo/APS
addixi/P
adequito/APS
adfixi/P
adfluxi/P
adfui/P
adhibui/P
adiunxi/P
adlegi/P
administro/APS
admonui/P
adnoto/APS
adnuto/APS
adorno/APS
adpetivi/P
adprehendi/P
adquievi/P
adscivi/P
adservo/APS
adsono/APS
adstruxi/P
adtexui/P
adtribui/P
adussi/P
adverti/P
advolo/APS
aequepependi/P
aequo/APS
affecto/APS
affluxi/P
aggrego/APS
albico/APS
allusi/P
alvi/P
ambulo/APS
amixi/P
amplio/APS
animadverti/P
antecessi/P
anticipo/APS
apervi/P
apparvi/P
appetivi/P
apposui/P
approximo/AP
arbitratus/Ph
argui/P
arrexi/P
arsi/P
aspargo/APS
aspersi/P
assequi/P
assigno/APS
assuefeci/P
asto/APS
attento/APS
attrecto/APS
audi/P
ausculto/APS
averti/P
avulsi/P
beavi/P
bibi/P
caeno/APS
calefeci/P
candido/APS
capessivi/P
carvi/P
cecidi/P
celo/APS
cepi/P
cinxi/P
circumcinxi/P
circumduxi/P
circumieci/P
circumsedi/P
circumstiti/P
circumverti/P
circunscripsi/P
clamito/APS
clepsi/P
coaequo/APS
coapto/APS
coarto/APS
coepi/Pq
cognomino/APS
coieci/P
collibro/APS
collisi/P
coloro/APS
comedi/P
commemoro/APS
commeto/APS
commodo/APS
commovi/P
comparo/APS
compenso/APS
competivi/P
complico/APS
composui/P
compressi/P
computo/APS
concelebro/APS
concessi/P
concinno/APS
conclamito/APS
concredidi/P
concubui/P
concupivi/P
concussi/P
condenso/APS
condono/APS
configuro/APS
conflicto/APS
confodi/P
confrico/APS
congrego/APS
conlacrimo/APS
conperi/P
conquievi/P
consedi/P
consocio/APS
consterno/APS
consului/P
contemplo/APS
continuo/APS
contuli/P
convici/P
corrasi/P
corusco/APS
cremo/APS
crevi/P
cupii/P
debilito/APS
declamo/APS
decucurri/P
defatigo/APS
deflagro/APS
degenero/APS
delegi/P
deliqui/P
demonstro/APS
denso/APS
depoposci/P
depuli/P
descendi/P
designo/APS
despondi/P
determino/APS
detrivi/P
devexi/P
devoui/P
diffinivi/P
dilacero/APS
dimisi/P
discidi/P
discurri/P
dispertii/P
dissaepsi/P
dissipo/APS
distribui/P
docui/P
ducto/APS
edi/P
effervi/P
efformo/APS
egi/P
elevo/APS
elvi/P
eminui/P
enitui/P
erexi/P
erugo/APS
evasi/P
evolo/APS
examino/APS
excandui/P
excito/APS
excubui/P
exemi/P
exilui/P
exorno/APS
expensi/P
explevi/P
expostulo/APS
expunxi/P
exspiro/APS
extabui/P
exto/APS
exulo/APS
facessi/P
feci/P
finii/P
flammo/APS
fluxi/P
fovi/P
frustro/APS
fundito/APS
genui/P
gravo/APS
haesi/P
horrui/P
illevi/P
imbui/P
impartivi/P
implevi/P
improbo/APS
inauro/APS
inchoo/APS
increbui/P
incurri/P
indigno/AP
inebrio/AP
inflexi/P
ingemino/APS
inhibui/P
inlidi/P
innui/P
insanivi/P
insidi/P
inspisso/APS
insuevi/P
intellexi/P
intercucurri/P
intermisi/P
intersevi/P
intro/APS
intumvi/P
invexi/P
irrisi/P
iugulo/APS
laboro/APS
lancino/APS
lasso/APS
lectito/APS
libro/APS
loco/APS
luxurio/APS
malui/P
manumisi/P
merui/P
minui/P
momordi/P
multiplico/APS
muto/APS
nego/APS
nocui/P
novo/APS
nutrii/P
obieci/P
obliquo/APS
obscuro/APS
obsto/ABPS
obtigi/P
obumbro/APS
occepi/P
occupo/APS
offundi/P
oppilo/APS
optinui/P
osculo/APS
parento/APS
parui/P
pedico/APS
peperi/P
percucurri/P
peremi/P
perfrico/APS
permadefeci/P
permulsi/P
perpetro/APS
persecui/P
perstiti/P
pertracto/APS
perveni/P
petivi/P
placo/APS
poenitui/P
porto/APS
potui/P
praeclusi/P
praefixi/P
praeluxi/P
praenovi/P
praescripsi/P
praetendi/P
prehendi/P
proclamo/APS
produxi/P
progenui/P
promico/APS
propero/APS
proripui/P
prospecto/APS
protraxi/P
provolvi/P
pulso/APS
quaesivi/P
rebello/APS
reciproco/APS
recompenso/APS
recurri/P
redimii/P
reflo/APS
regno/APS
reluxi/P
renuntio/APS
replevi/P
repsi/P
resarsi/P
reservo/APS
respondi/P
resurrexi/P
retraxi/P
reveni/P
revoco/APS
rogo/APS
rupi/P
sagino/APS
sanxi/P
scivi/P
secundo/APS
sensi/P
servivi/P
signo/APS
solvi/P
specto/APS
stabilivi/P
stiti/P
stupui/P
subfui/P
submersi/P
subrisi/P
substravi/P
subverti/P
succollo/APS
suffoco/APS
superfluxi/P
supersteti/P
supplico/APS
suscito/APS
temero/APS
terrifico/APS
texui/P
torno/APS
trano/APS
transilvi/P
transtuli/P
triplico/APS
tumefeci/P
unxi/P
valui/P
velo/APS
ventito/APS
vestivi/P
viduo/APS
visito/APS
volito/APS
vulsi/P
